lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1962 Y 1
SFX 1962 0 වාන් .
SFX 4476 Y 1
SFX 4476 0 ්ථකව .
SFX 3505 Y 1
SFX 3505 0 වානේ .
SFX 3303 Y 1
SFX 3303 0 ාදීමට .
SFX 4666 Y 1
SFX 4666 0 ෙස්වල .
SFX 2312 Y 1
SFX 2312 0 ියන්ගෙන් .
SFX 1955 Y 1
SFX 1955 0 වීමක .
SFX 88 Y 1
SFX 88 0 වීමට .
SFX 1590 Y 1
SFX 1590 0 වීමද .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 0 ඥයා .
SFX 3464 Y 1
SFX 3464 0 වීමය .
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 0 ඥයෝ .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 වීම් .
SFX 2471 Y 1
SFX 2471 0 වීමි .
SFX 2470 Y 1
SFX 2470 0 වීමු .
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 0 වීමේ .
SFX 1572 Y 1
SFX 1572 0 ාංශය .
SFX 3767 Y 1
SFX 3767 0 මාරු .
SFX 2625 Y 1
SFX 2625 0 බැස .
SFX 1731 Y 1
SFX 1731 0 ගමනය .
SFX 4240 Y 1
SFX 4240 0 ්වැඩියාව .
SFX 3107 Y 1
SFX 3107 0 ිවලදී .
SFX 1553 Y 1
SFX 1553 0 ෑව .
SFX 2468 Y 1
SFX 2468 0 වුන්ට .
SFX 4167 Y 1
SFX 4167 0 කටයි .
SFX 2050 Y 1
SFX 2050 0 මස් .
SFX 2959 Y 1
SFX 2959 0 ෝත්සවය .
SFX 140 Y 1
SFX 140 0 ෙයි .
SFX 3957 Y 1
SFX 3957 0 දරය .
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 0 යකුත් .
SFX 1082 Y 1
SFX 1082 0 යනුත් .
SFX 4248 Y 1
SFX 4248 0 ්වාදුන් .
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 න්නට .
SFX 2501 Y 1
SFX 2501 0 වරයාත් .
SFX 3956 Y 1
SFX 3956 0 දරා .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 0 දරු .
SFX 970 Y 1
SFX 970 0 න්නා .
SFX 3862 Y 1
SFX 3862 0 න්නී .
SFX 679 Y 1
SFX 679 0 න්නෙ .
SFX 103 Y 1
SFX 103 0 න්නේ .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 න්නෝ .
SFX 3216 Y 1
SFX 3216 0 ැවෙන .
SFX 4853 Y 1
SFX 4853 0 ුපිටිය .
SFX 2210 Y 1
SFX 2210 0 ්තියක් .
SFX 2153 Y 1
SFX 2153 0 කාරිත්වයට .
SFX 3494 Y 1
SFX 3494 0 වාසි .
SFX 1049 Y 1
SFX 1049 0 වාසී .
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 0 ාකාරයේ .
SFX 4818 Y 1
SFX 4818 0 ුරින් .
SFX 4123 Y 1
SFX 4123 0 කාරිත්වයේ .
SFX 3920 Y 1
SFX 3920 0 දේශීය .
SFX 782 Y 1
SFX 782 0 වූහ .
SFX 1650 Y 1
SFX 1650 0 යන්නේ .
SFX 1133 Y 1
SFX 1133 0 ්නීය .
SFX 625 Y 1
SFX 625 0 ිකාව .
SFX 4914 Y 1
SFX 4914 0 ීිම .
SFX 3365 Y 1
SFX 3365 0 හදා .
SFX 4754 Y 1
SFX 4754 0 ූප .
SFX 4751 Y 1
SFX 4751 0 ූල .
SFX 3026 Y 1
SFX 3026 0 ූව .
SFX 4743 Y 1
SFX 4743 0 ූෂ .
SFX 654 Y 1
SFX 654 0 ූහ .
SFX 2068 Y 1
SFX 2068 0 බණ්ඩා .
SFX 4745 Y 1
SFX 4745 0 ූවෙක් .
SFX 4746 Y 1
SFX 4746 0 ූවෙකි .
SFX 1875 Y 1
SFX 1875 0 ැවුණු .
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 0 රාමය .
SFX 4938 Y 1
SFX 4938 0 ීමෙහි .
SFX 3443 Y 1
SFX 3443 0 වේදීන්ගේ .
SFX 3652 Y 1
SFX 3652 0 රාම් .
SFX 4343 Y 1
SFX 4343 0 ්‍යවාදී .
SFX 1444 Y 1
SFX 1444 0 කුමාර .
SFX 2488 Y 1
SFX 2488 0 වාටත් .
SFX 1859 Y 1
SFX 1859 0 ිනිය .
SFX 282 Y 1
SFX 282 0 වෙහි .
SFX 2487 Y 1
SFX 2487 0 වාදින් .
SFX 1041 Y 1
SFX 1041 0 හාමි .
SFX 2216 Y 1
SFX 2216 0 ්ඩ් .
SFX 4521 Y 1
SFX 4521 0 ්ඩා .
SFX 4519 Y 1
SFX 4519 0 ්ඩු .
SFX 773 Y 1
SFX 773 0 ියන්ට .
SFX 4064 Y 1
SFX 4064 0 ගෙයි .
SFX 2142 Y 1
SFX 2142 0 චාරය .
SFX 4289 Y 1
SFX 4289 0 ්ලයට .
SFX 1416 Y 1
SFX 1416 0 නවද .
SFX 1415 Y 1
SFX 1415 0 නවල .
SFX 2120 Y 1
SFX 2120 0 තියෙන් .
SFX 2082 Y 1
SFX 2082 0 න්ස් .
SFX 591 Y 1
SFX 591 0 ාගාර .
SFX 240 Y 1
SFX 240 0 නවා .
SFX 4288 Y 1
SFX 4288 0 ්ලයේ .
SFX 3437 Y 1
SFX 3437 0 ශාන්ත .
SFX 3808 Y 1
SFX 3808 0 බලයක් .
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 0 ෙහිදී .
SFX 4482 Y 1
SFX 4482 0 ්ත්‍ර .
SFX 4985 Y 1
SFX 4985 0 ිහීම .
SFX 2030 Y 1
SFX 2030 0 යාවට .
SFX 4039 Y 1
SFX 4039 0 ටමත් .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 0 යාවේ .
SFX 2170 Y 1
SFX 2170 0 ්වෙලා .
SFX 3531 Y 1
SFX 3531 0 වරයෙකුට .
SFX 4418 Y 1
SFX 4418 0 ්නෙන් .
SFX 281 Y 1
SFX 281 0 ාත්මක .
SFX 4871 Y 1
SFX 4871 0 ුනම් .
SFX 3536 Y 1
SFX 3536 0 වරණයේදී .
SFX 1328 Y 1
SFX 1328 0 ුණෙමි .
SFX 2282 Y 1
SFX 2282 0 ුණෙමු .
SFX 2923 Y 1
SFX 2923 0 ්ථක .
SFX 1256 Y 1
SFX 1256 0 තාවයට .
SFX 1379 Y 1
SFX 1379 0 වහන්සේ .
SFX 3993 Y 1
SFX 3993 0 තාවයද .
SFX 4571 Y 1
SFX 4571 0 ්කක් .
SFX 2226 Y 1
SFX 2226 0 ෝපාය .
SFX 2746 Y 1
SFX 2746 0 තන් .
SFX 1428 Y 1
SFX 1428 0 තාවයේ .
SFX 3942 Y 1
SFX 3942 0 දික .
SFX 1097 Y 1
SFX 1097 0 දිග .
SFX 887 Y 1
SFX 887 0 දින .
SFX 2717 Y 1
SFX 2717 0 දිම .
SFX 454 Y 1
SFX 454 0 දිය .
SFX 4839 Y 1
SFX 4839 0 ුමයෙන් .
SFX 3382 Y 1
SFX 3382 0 සේකරගේ .
SFX 4762 Y 1
SFX 4762 0 ුස්සාකැලේ .
SFX 149 Y 1
SFX 149 0 නම් .
SFX 3563 Y 1
SFX 3563 0 වත්කම .
SFX 4266 Y 1
SFX 4266 0 ්වයන් .
SFX 3664 Y 1
SFX 3664 0 රයත් .
SFX 1080 Y 1
SFX 1080 0 යාමට .
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 0 යාමේ .
SFX 4411 Y 1
SFX 4411 0 ්නෝද .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 ්නෝය .
SFX 4156 Y 1
SFX 4156 0 කයක .
SFX 4155 Y 1
SFX 4155 0 කයට .
SFX 3935 Y 1
SFX 3935 0 දීමයි .
SFX 3763 Y 1
SFX 3763 0 මික .
SFX 2372 Y 1
SFX 2372 0 ාලයක් .
SFX 3762 Y 1
SFX 3762 0 මිත .
SFX 4205 Y 1
SFX 4205 0 ්ෂණය .
SFX 1325 Y 1
SFX 1325 0 ුදු .
SFX 999 Y 1
SFX 999 0 කයෙක් .
SFX 2834 Y 1
SFX 2834 0 කයෙකි .
SFX 1098 Y 1
SFX 1098 0 ත්වයයි .
SFX 1274 Y 1
SFX 1274 0 කයෙකු .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 ේපොළ .
SFX 437 Y 1
SFX 437 0 කයා .
SFX 817 Y 1
SFX 817 0 කයි .
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 0 කයේ .
SFX 2833 Y 1
SFX 2833 0 කයො .
SFX 1802 Y 1
SFX 1802 0 ෙත්ම .
SFX 614 Y 1
SFX 614 0 කයෝ .
SFX 918 Y 1
SFX 918 0 ුන්ට .
SFX 4859 Y 1
SFX 4859 0 ුන්ද .
SFX 3938 Y 1
SFX 3938 0 දියා .
SFX 2715 Y 1
SFX 2715 0 දියේ .
SFX 3974 Y 1
SFX 3974 0 ත්‍රයක් .
SFX 2132 Y 1
SFX 2132 0 ණයන්ට .
SFX 4008 Y 1
SFX 4008 0 තබා .
SFX 2592 Y 1
SFX 2592 0 ‍යයන් .
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 ්වන .
SFX 1288 Y 1
SFX 1288 0 ්වය .
SFX 99 Y 1
SFX 99 0 ්වල .
SFX 3498 Y 1
SFX 3498 0 වාලීමට .
SFX 3781 Y 1
SFX 3781 0 මයයි .
SFX 821 Y 1
SFX 821 0 ්වා .
SFX 510 Y 1
SFX 510 0 ්වී .
SFX 1467 Y 1
SFX 1467 0 ්වු .
SFX 472 Y 1
SFX 472 0 ්වූ .
SFX 615 Y 1
SFX 615 0 ්වේ .
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 0 රන්ගේ .
SFX 41 Y 1
SFX 41 0 න්ට .
SFX 802 Y 1
SFX 802 0 න්ඩ .
SFX 578 Y 1
SFX 578 0 න්ත .
SFX 190 Y 1
SFX 190 0 න්ද .
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 0 ෝදය .
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 0 න්න .
SFX 336 Y 1
SFX 336 0 න්ම .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 න්ය .
SFX 4481 Y 1
SFX 4481 0 ්ත්‍රණය .
SFX 4484 Y 1
SFX 4484 0 ්තොත් .
SFX 2154 Y 1
SFX 2154 0 කාන්ත .
SFX 737 Y 1
SFX 737 0 න්ව .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 ාගෙන .
SFX 3874 Y 1
SFX 3874 0 න්තයෙන් .
SFX 4664 Y 1
SFX 4664 0 ෙහිද .
SFX 1308 Y 1
SFX 1308 0 ෙහිම .
SFX 2630 Y 1
SFX 2630 0 බද්ධ .
SFX 549 Y 1
SFX 549 0 ැති .
SFX 3524 Y 1
SFX 3524 0 වරෙන් .
SFX 4567 Y 1
SFX 4567 0 ්කරණය .
SFX 537 Y 1
SFX 537 0 කැයි .
SFX 4929 Y 1
SFX 4929 0 ීයකරණයට .
SFX 881 Y 1
SFX 881 0 නැයි .
SFX 3685 Y 1
SFX 3685 0 යෙහිම .
SFX 1870 Y 1
SFX 1870 0 ිකයනට .
SFX 3442 Y 1
SFX 3442 0 වේදීන්ට .
SFX 2647 Y 1
SFX 2647 0 පතිවරයාගේ .
SFX 572 Y 1
SFX 572 0 වමින් .
SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 0 වමිනි .
SFX 479 Y 1
SFX 479 0 ිකයන් .
SFX 2536 Y 1
SFX 2536 0 ල්ලන් .
SFX 2039 Y 1
SFX 2039 0 යකැයි .
SFX 2697 Y 1
SFX 2697 0 ධූරයට .
SFX 2598 Y 1
SFX 2598 0 යකදි .
SFX 250 Y 1
SFX 250 0 යකදී .
SFX 1925 Y 1
SFX 1925 0 ස්ථානයකට .
SFX 4158 Y 1
SFX 4158 0 කමෙන් .
SFX 3861 Y 1
SFX 3861 0 න්නෙත් .
SFX 4622 Y 1
SFX 4622 0 ොටීන් .
SFX 4923 Y 1
SFX 4923 0 ීයාමට .
SFX 2125 Y 1
SFX 2125 0 තරය .
SFX 947 Y 1
SFX 947 0 ස්ථානයක් .
SFX 1476 Y 1
SFX 1476 0 ්මට .
SFX 2413 Y 1
SFX 2413 0 ස්ථානයකි .
SFX 4384 Y 1
SFX 4384 0 ්මන .
SFX 2890 Y 1
SFX 2890 0 ්මය .
SFX 3998 Y 1
SFX 3998 0 තරු .
SFX 1628 Y 1
SFX 1628 0 ලන් .
SFX 3621 Y 1
SFX 3621 0 ලනු .
SFX 1852 Y 1
SFX 1852 0 ියහොත් .
SFX 1762 Y 1
SFX 1762 0 ්මි .
SFX 4375 Y 1
SFX 4375 0 ්මී .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 ්මේ .
SFX 3349 Y 1
SFX 3349 0 හැටි .
SFX 2706 Y 1
SFX 2706 0 දොර .
SFX 4149 Y 1
SFX 4149 0 කරණයකට .
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 0 මත්ම .
SFX 4492 Y 1
SFX 4492 0 ්තියෙන් .
SFX 2680 Y 1
SFX 2680 0 නාට .
SFX 4561 Y 1
SFX 4561 0 ්කාමීහු .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 0 නාද .
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 0 කරණයක් .
SFX 3896 Y 1
SFX 3896 0 නාම .
SFX 1440 Y 1
SFX 1440 0 ගන්ඩ .
SFX 1430 Y 1
SFX 1430 0 තයක් .
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 ගන්න .
SFX 2056 Y 1
SFX 2056 0 මත්ව .
SFX 4004 Y 1
SFX 4004 0 තයකි .
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 0 ණියන් .
SFX 1242 Y 1
SFX 1242 0 නාව .
SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 0 නාහ .
SFX 709 Y 1
SFX 709 0 ීන්ට .
SFX 2281 Y 1
SFX 2281 0 ුණේය .
SFX 197 Y 1
SFX 197 0 ත්වයෙන් .
SFX 4862 Y 1
SFX 4862 0 ුන්ගෙ .
SFX 765 Y 1
SFX 765 0 ුන්ගේ .
SFX 3971 Y 1
SFX 3971 0 ත්වයෙනි .
SFX 4406 Y 1
SFX 4406 0 ්පතට .
SFX 853 Y 1
SFX 853 0 හැර .
SFX 981 Y 1
SFX 981 0 ත්වයකින් .
SFX 1005 Y 1
SFX 1005 0 ්පත් .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 0 ්පතා .
SFX 3376 Y 1
SFX 3376 0 ස්ථානයේදී .
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 0 ්පතේ .
SFX 4368 Y 1
SFX 4368 0 ්යක්ෂමතාව .
SFX 2816 Y 1
SFX 2816 0 කෑම .
SFX 4352 Y 1
SFX 4352 0 ්‍යයන්හි .
SFX 2798 Y 1
SFX 2798 0 ක්‍රියා .
SFX 790 Y 1
SFX 790 0 වරක් .
