lib/hunspell-1.2.10/src/tools/dics/si_LK/dictionaries/si-LK.dic
අවි/2,6,13,21,29,43,122,125,133,427,1050,1121,1436,1690,2103,2698,2773,3359,3360,3432,3956,4086
අළුත/489,1490,4240,4241,4569
ඇමැති/2,10,40,52,100,112,132,161,232,249,291,334,346,382,397,423,424,527,596,789,920,1092,1120,1833,1972,2101,2274,2499,2501,2732,3532,4158,4846,4939
එක්/10,17,36,52,64,76,86,87,88,93,100,131,145,156,172,177,189,218,247,274,293,298,343,379,408,422,445,457,570,595,612,644,664,689,719,782,784,790,818,887,902,985,1116,1272,1273,1367,1372,1442,1460,1949,1955,2114,2462,2469,2479,2519,2624,2718,2723,2832,3649,3878,4101,4115
ක්‍රියා/20,86,172,252,253,274,298,414,457,552,565,612,613,644,716,743,1114,1446,1451,1457,1736,1742,2046,2152,2153,2577,2651,2726,2813,2822,3434,3945,4122,4123,4124,4125,4132
ගොඩ/1,3,4,7,11,14,18,23,64,76,87,88,125,131,143,183,212,217,218,224,248,347,379,420,450,564,595,677,687,812,814,877,937,967,992,1109,1122,1167,1230,1407,1727,2026,2063,2069,2471,2625,3906,4071
ජනා/13,29,3957
තල්/2050
දැක්ක/49,115,303,3464
දෙන/4,6,8,10,17,20,24,35,45,79,94,129,155,163,174,175,183,207,215,221,224,225,231,266,279,303,364,436,473,590,778,956,1113,1194,1311,1381,1629,1803,1851,1902,1965,2066,2149,2246,2488,2809,3011,3043,3315,3505,4727,4732,4735,4738
නැව/3,4,5,7,17,22,42,80,99,117,128,140,216,610,1101,1103,2312
නීති/2,13,15,19,21,29,38,48,60,90,101,198,390,469,781,988,1087,1190,1264,1265,1266,1397,1486,1718,1720,1948,2455,3444,4042,4045,4078,4333,4334
පටු/33,87,95,1675,3494
පත්කර/679,802
පසුව/2,6,11,12,33,39,42,51,59,80,82,83,102,103,113,126,140,207,230,240,246,265,270,276,402,492,543,545,641,766,889,1506,3862,4693
පැමිණිය/481,942,2468
පැවැත්/36,50,64,65,75,76,78,87,88,105,131,143,145,177,189,217,218,235,247,273,305,343,370,379,391,422,430,445,465,480,554,571,721,722,736,782,783,785,965,1047,1048,1193,1369,1590,1954,2463,2464,2470,2472,3449,3474
පිර/3,16,20,42,59,64,76,80,83,88,102,121,131,140,143,145,175,209,211,220,241,262,263,270,310,316,326,343,374,375,379,392,402,521,543,554,588,621,624,782,841,929,1026,1031,1314,1348,1498,1522,1825,1827,1842,2467,3089,3091,3172,3887,4780,4982,4984,4985,4986
පිහිටු/177,218,722,724,1590,1952
පුර/2,8,9,10,13,15,19,20,21,33,35,103,123,144,156,267,268,295,303,408,443,469,630,669,737,1052,1325,1404,1416,2083,2084,2215,2287,2368,2481,2505,3087,3313,3314,3481,3482,3483,3499,3510,3534,3834,3847,4764,4873
පෙළ/1,3,4,6,17,18,20,22,23,28,33,59,80,102,121,140,144,203,246,270,280,310,492,543,885,1086,1575,1798,2040,2649,3228,3736,3737,3825,3826,4071,4689
පොත/1,3,4,5,7,16,17,22,24,32,85,99,110,118,152,193,229,475,513,640,1005,1086,1754,1769,2899,2924,2935,3846,4399,4540,4852,4853
ප්‍රදාන/2,5,13,15,27,62,296,2959,2960
ප්‍රදේශ/5,12,13,15,19,21,26,27,29,30,38,43,46,48,60,62,66,70,114,123,185,186,199,226,234,250,318,368,460,499,502,603,604,667,674,723,734,952,1049,1399,1961,1971,2599,3492,3493,4156
ප්‍රා/1108,2764,3920
බහින්බස්/344
භූත/27,47,79,426,1082,1566,1567,1996,4590
මාන/3,10,15,16,19,20,21,38,58,63,79,180,277,597,1045,1553,1558,1881,2207,2988,3179,3541,3544,4485
මුල්/895,1459,1609,2625,2803,2820
මෝර/20,103,165,231,763,3084
රාශි/2,13,15,38,43,46,48,53,296,313,383,390,1400,1831
රැකියාව/1,3,4,7,9,17,22,23,32,34,41,56,104,148,2162,4167
රොක්/64,76,87,268,782,791,3459
ලංකා/952,1620,1731,2011,3916,4012
විද/20,24,42,144,350,604,623,1265,1792,1915,2885,2972,3364,4325,4328,4329,4331,4337,4338,4342,4629,4631,4666
විද්‍යා/15,321,638,729,781,989,1046,1264,1265,1266,1718,1719,1720,2001,2768,3624,4042,4043,4877
ව්‍යාපෘත/2210
සපය/11,20,69,82,144,206,240,245,577,680,3303
සම්පූර්ණ/10,11,21,64,73,88,427
සර්/1,10,69,151,160,1962,2452,2495,2827,3805
සිව්/975,2707,2723,3776,4099
සීරු/36,45,54,3767
සොය/20,206,406,630,702,851,885,1175,1568,1903,1907,2395,2396,3056,3318,3323,4818
හඳුන/5,11,20,33,35,103,206,349,406,489,630,641,695,821,851,905,906,1175,1568,1569,1753,1903,2180,2183,2396,2859,2866,2869,3322,4248,4249,4250,4270,4274
හවුල්/4123
හිඟ/2,3,11,13,19,20,21,33,36,43,48,60,64,100,123,139,161,273,583,702,970,2469,3785
හේතුව/2,3,4,6,7,11,22,23,28,33,42,51,77,82,83,103,104,140,165,240,270,278,299,341,651,2840
